Washington statutes.
RCW 13.16.020

Lack of detention facilities constitutes emergency.

The attention of the legislature having been called to the absence of juvenile detention facilities in the various counties of the state, the legislature hereby declares that this situation constitutes an emergency demanding the invocation by the several counties affected of the emergency powers granted by virtue of RCW 36.40.140 through 36.40.200.

[ 1945 c 188 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2004-1.]